Tennessee, session 114, HB2501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-2-522(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the language "January 1, 2027" and substituting instead "January 15, 2027".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2501
012222
- 1 -